Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-9201
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-9201 to 71-9204
shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Transparency Act.

Laws 2014, LB76, § 1.
February 14, 2014